Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2419
Physician, nurse, or pharmacist; disciplinary action or criminal prosecution; limitation.

A physician licensed under the Medicine and Surgery Practice Act who prescribes, dispenses, or administers or a nurse licensed under the Nurse Practice Act or pharmacist licensed under the Pharmacy Practice Act who administers or dispenses a controlled substance in excess of the recommended dosage for the treatment of pain shall not be subject to discipline under the Uniform Credentialing Act or criminal prosecution under the Uniform Controlled Substances Act when: (1) In the judgment of the physician, appropriate pain management warrants such dosage; (2) the controlled substance is not administered for the purpose of causing, or the purpose of assisting in causing, death for any reason; and (3) the administration of the controlled substance conforms to policies and guidelines for the treatment of pain adopted by the Board of Medicine and Surgery.

Laws 1999, LB 226, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 73;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1197.

Medicine and Surgery Practice Act, see section 38-2001.

Nurse Practice Act, see section 38-2201.

Pharmacy Practice Act, see section 38-2801.

Uniform Controlled Substances Act, see section 28-401.01.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.